Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions on county organization, see art. 12, Wyo. Const. For constitutional provisions on municipal corporations, see art. 13, Wyo. Const. For general provisions on the administration of government, see title 9. For general provisions on cities and towns, see title 15. For general provisions on counties, see title 18.

Revision of title. —

Laws 1982, ch. 62, revised titles 9, 16 and 25. Section 1 of chapter 62 renumbered the provisions of former title 16, Contracts. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Section 3, ch. 62, Laws 1982, renumbered and amended former §§

9-1-101

through 9-21-103,

25-2-101

through 25-4-105 and

35-13-101

through 35-13-104 as §§

9-1-101

through

9-8-302

,

16-1-101

through

16-7-121

and

25-1-104

through

25-10-305

. No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1982 act has been attempted, but historical citations to the former W.S. 1977 provisions have been added to the corresponding sections in this title.

In addition to the amendments made by Laws 1982, ch. 62, Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, and Laws 1982, chs. 6, 16, 28 and 74, amended various sections in this title. Where there are conflicting amendments of the same section, the section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Law: Rulemaking and Contested Case Practice in Wyoming,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 685 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions § 193 et seq.72 Am. Jur. 2d States, Territories, and Dependencies §§ 1 to 6, 8 to 12, 15 to 17.

62 C.J.S. Municipal Corporations § 104 et seq.; 81A C.J.S. States §§ 36, 37.